Arkansas, session 2025, SB597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-60-126. Threat of harm upon a financial institution employee.
(a) As used in this section, "financial institution employee" means an
employee who performs financial institution services and is employed by a:
(1) State or national bank or trust company;
(2) State or federal savings and loan association;
(3) State or federal credit union; or
(4) Mortgage loan lender.
(b) A person commits the offense of a threat of harm upon a financial
institution employee if he or she, under circumstances manifesting extreme
indifference to the safety of the financial institution employee, purposely
engages in conduct that threatens or creates a potential danger to the
financial institution employee while the financial institution employee is
engaged in the course of his or her employment.
(c) A threat of harm upon a financial institution employee is a Class
*ANS432*
04/01/2025 9:18:21 AM ANS432

SB597
B misdemeanor.
(d) This section does not amend, modify, or affect:
(1) Sections 9-27-318(g) or 9-27-318(h)(2) that requires a
finding by clear and convincing evidence to transfer a juvenile case to
circuit court for prosecution as an adult; and
(2) Sections 5-2-327 or 5-2-328 governing the determination of a
defendant's fitness to proceed in a criminal case.





























04/01/2025 9:18:21 AM ANS432